Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.080

Service when state or county lands are involved.

In case the land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated or damaged is state, school or county land, the summons and copy of petition shall be served on the auditor of the county in which such land, real estate, premises or other property is situated. Service upon other parties defendant shall be made in the same manner as is or shall be provided by law for service of summons in other civil actions.

[ 1907 c 153 s 6; RRS s 9220. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 6; 1893 c 84 s 6.]

NOTES:

Service of process where state land is involved: RCW 8.28.010.